ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/bg_BG/hyph_bg_BG.dic
UTF-8
% ADOBE CONFIDENTIAL
% ___________________
%
%  Copyright ©2011 Adobe Systems Incorporated
%  All Rights Reserved.
%
% NOTICE:  All information contained herein is, and remains
% the property of Adobe Systems Incorporated and its suppliers,
% if any.  The intellectual and technical concepts contained
% herein are proprietary to Adobe Systems Incorporated and its
% suppliers and are protected by trade secret or copyright law.
% Dissemination of this information or reproduction of this material
% is strictly forbidden unless prior written permission is obtained
% from Adobe Systems Incorporated.
%
% Version 1.0.1
%
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
NOHYPHEN -,',’
1-1
1'1
1’1
NEXTLEVEL
.а2
.а1ри1
.ас1т
.ат1р
.аг1р
.а1г
.ап1р
.а1п
.в2
.ва3жн2о.
.1ва
.важ2
.важ1н
.важ1но
.во3д2
.вик3нах
.1ви
.вик2н
.вик1на
.ви1д4
.вер2н
.ве3р1ни
.вес2
.ве3с1то
.ве3ст2т
.ве3ст2и.
.ве3д2но
.вед1н
.вдиг4
.в2д
.в1ди
.вди3гн2а.
.вдиг1на
.вди3гна2т.
.вди3гна2х.
.вдиг3нах
.взе3хм
.в2з2
.рас1т
.раз1
.ри2т1м
.ри1т
.ревно2с3т4т
.рев1н
.рев1но
.ру4ск2и.
.ру1ск
.ръ1с2
.м2
.магис3трал
.1ма
.ма1г
.ма1ги
.мос1
.1мо
.мо3с1то
.молих3м
.мо1ли
.ми1сл
.миг1р
.ме3с4т2о.
.мес1то
.б2
.бо3лн2и.
.бол4ни
.бол1н
.бо3лни1т
.бо3лния
.би1х
.бе3д1на
.б2е
.бед2н
.с2
.спя1х
.с1пя
.о2
.ов3ц
.ом1р
.об1р
.об1л
.ос1м
.ос1л
.ос1ъз
.от1в2
.от1р
.о1то1
.от1ъ
.ог1л
.о1ч1а
.очис3т4ван
.о1чи
.очиств2
.очист1ва
.окая2
.ок1р
.оз3н
.оп1р
.оп1л
.оп1и
.оп1у
.лис3ти
.ли3ч4но2стт
.личност4
.лич1н
.лич3но
.ю2
.тво3р2ц
.тв2
.тръ1п2
.т2ег4
.1те
.тег3ля
.те3гн2е.
.тег1не
.настъп3л
.1на
.нас2
.на1стъ
.на1д2л
.на1з
.не1д2
.1не
.и2
.иму1ще3
.иму1щ
.ис1
.иг1
.из1м2
.е2
.ев1р
.ес1ен
.е1се
.ед1р
.ед2нат
.ед1н
.ед1на
.ед2но1т
.ед1но
.ед2ни1т
.ед1ни
.ефек3ти
.г2
.г4ва
.2гв
.го1д2
.у2
.ув1р
.ус1к
.у1ле1
.ут1р
.учас3т4ни1ц
.у1ча
.учас2т1н
.участ1ни
.уп1р
.чи3сля
.1чи
.чес3ти
.1че
.чувст3ве
.чувств2
.к2
.кас1т
.качест3
.ка1че
.каз4ван
.ка2з1в
.каз1ва
.ка3зва3не
.ко3нници
.кон4ни1ц
.кон1н
.кон1ни
.ъ2
.1ц2
.ш2
.1шу1
.я2
.я2в1л
.я1в
.д2
.дос1
.до3с4та1ве
.дос1та
.ди1г2
.1ди
.де3сн2и.
.1де
.дес2ни
.з2
.зо1
.зор2
.п2
.па3з2
.пра3в4ну
.пра2в1н
.пра3в1да
.прав2д
.про3све1те
.прос2в
.прос1ве
.прос3ти
.прос3те2н.
.прос2те
.прие4м3а2т.
.при1ем
.прие1ма
.при1е2л
.при1е2т
.при1е2х
.повес3ти
.по1ве
.поро3ч4нос
.по1ро
.пороч1н
.пороч3но
.по3с2т
.по4с3т2и.
.по3сти
.по4с3ти1т
.поч2н
.по3чн2а.
.поч1на
.по1ко2и
.по1к
.по1зн
.пуб1
.пу3ск2а.
.ху1
.живя3хм
.1жи
.жи1вя
2а.
а1ам
а1ал
а1ат
а1ан
а1ад
а1аз
а3вре1ди
ав1м
ав1с
авст2
а1во
аво3д2ни
авод1н
ав3ла
а3владяв2а.
ав4ла1дя
авладя1в
авладя1ва
а3владяват
а1вли
а2в1н
ав4ну
авис3ти
а1ви
ави1к
а1ве
авес1т
аве3дник
авед1н
авед1ни
а1въ
а1в2ц
ав3з2
а1ра
араст4
арст3ват
ар1с
арс2т2
арств2
арст1ва
а1ро
а1рю
а1ри
ари3с2та
ари3сти
арих1м
а1ре
ар3ес1та
ар3ес1ти
аре1к
а1ру
а1ръ
а1ря
арях1м
ам1р
амос4
а1мо
а2м1л
а1ми
ами3сл2и.
ами3сли1т
ами3сле
амис3ля
а1ме
аме1тр
а1му
а1мъ
а1мя
аба1вл
а1ба
а3брави1т
абра1ви
аб1р2и.
аб1ре
а1бо
а1бл
а2б1лиз
а1би
а1б2е
абеля3за
абе1ля
а1бу
а1бъ
а1бя
ас3в
ас1б
а2с3лож
ас1лен
астав3л
ас1та
аст1в2
а3ст4ва1ща
аст1ва
ас1три
а4с3тоя2ван
ас1то
асто1я1в
астоя1ва
а1с2той1
ас3т3ници1т
аст4ни1ц
ас2т1н
аст1ни
а4стил
а1с1тин
асти3г2
а3сти1га
ас3тигн
а3с4тиг3на2т.
асти4гнат
астиг1на
астъпни1че3
астъп1н
астъп1ни
а2с3тъ1пя
ас3неман
ас1не
асне1ма
а1снет
а1си
аск2
а1скав
ас1кат
а1с2ках
ас1кв
ас3ко
ас3къ
а1съ
ас3п
а1о
ао1б
ао2т3е2ц.
ао1те
аоте1ц
ао1к
а1ла
а1л2мо
ал1м
а1ло
а1лю
а1ли
али3с2та
али3ст2и.
а3лиз
а1ле
алек2т
але3к1та
але3кти
алци2т
ал1ц
а1ля
2ал1д2
ата1с
а1та
а2т3въ
атв2
а1тро
атро1г2
ат3репе1ри
атре1пе
а3т4репе1ря
а1тру
ат3ръ
ат1л
а1т2т
а3т2ник
а2т1н
ат1ни
а1ти
ати3ска
атиск2
ател4ст3ва2т.
а1те
ател1с
ателст2
ателств2
ателст1ва
а1ту
а1тъ
ана1с2
а1на
ана1стъ3
ана1х2т
ан1ра
ан3ст2
а2н1с
аничес3т
а1ни
ани1че
ани1х2т
а3не
а1ну
а1ив
а1ир
а1им
аи1ме
а1ис
аисторичес3
аис1то
аисто1ри
аистори1че
а1ил
а1ин
аи1н2ц
а1ич
а1и1з2
а1и1щ
а1ем
ае1мия
а1ел
а1ет
а1ен
а1ек
а1еш
а1ед
а1ех
аех1м
аех3т
а1ей1
а1ещ
а1г
агра1б2
а2г3раб1в
а2г3ра1дя
а4гри
а2г3ри1жи
а4гръ
а2г1лу
а2гн
аг1ент
а1ге
а1у
ау1ми
ау1к
а4чис
а1чи
ач3ис3ле2н.
ачи3сле1ни
а1чу
а1ка
ак1в
а3к2вал.
ак1ва
ак4ваш
а1к2ви1т
ак1ви
а2к1ре
ак3с
а1ко
а4кля3
ак3лятие
аклят2
акля1ти
ак1т
ак4та
ак4т2и.
ак2тир
ак2ти1т
а1к2тъ
а1ки
а1ке
а1ку
а1къ
а1шл
а1я1в
ая2в1л
а1яс
а1ял
а1я2т
а1ян
ая2но
ая2ни1т
ая1ни
а1яд
а1ях
ад1в
а3два1ни
ад1ва
ад1м
а1до
адо3сти
а1длъ
а1дт
ад3нат
ад1н
ад1на
ади1хм
а1ди
адесет4
а1де
аде1се
адесе3тт
адей3
адей2ст2
адейс2
а1дъ
ад3п
ад3жи
а1д2ж
аз1р
аз2рея
а1з2ря
аз3м2
а1зов
аз1ор
аз1от
аз1л
а1зи
азиск3
а2з1ис
а1зе
аз1уч
а1зя3в
аз1я3д
азпад2
аз1п2
азпа3д1не
азпад1н
а1п
ап3рав2а.
а2пра1ва
а3прават
аправ3л
а2п1с
апове3дт
апо1ве
апос3
апоз3
а2п1лак
а2п1т
а2п1н
апус1
ах3в
а3хр
а4хран1в
а4хра3не
ах3ранен
а1хл
а1ху
а1фа
аф1р
а1фо
а1фи
ай3с2
ай1
ай2с1т2
айс3тв2
а1щр
а1жо
а1жно1т
аж1н
аж1но
а1жи1
аживях3м
ажи1вя
а1жъ
а2ж3д
2в.
1ва
ва1р2на
вар1н
вас3т
ва1лу
ва1лъ
2ват2о.
ва1то
3ва1те
ва1др
ва1хм
ва1х2т
3вайк
вай1
3ващия
ва1щи
важ2
ва1ж1на
важ1н
ва1ж1ни
в1ра1ц
вра1з
в1ро
в1ри1т
1врем
в1реи
в1ре2д.
1вре1дя
в1ру
в3ст2в2а.
вств2
вст1ва
вст4вал
в3ст2ва1та
в1ство
вст3ве2н.
вст3вен2о.
встве1но
в1ству
встъп4
встъ3пван
встъ2п1в
встъп1ва
в1ск
1в2ся
вори3х2т
во1ри
во1ръ
4воря1в
во1ря
во1б
4вободит2е.
вобо1ди
вободи1т
вободи1те
1вобож
во1сл
во4с3ла1ве
во1съ
вол2ст2
вол1с
3волит2е.
во1ли
воли1т
воли1те
во1ти
во1тъ
во3н
во4ин
во1и
вое1в
во1е
во1к
водей3ст1ви
во1де
водей1
водейс2
водей2ст
водейств2
1во1п
3владявай1
в4ла1дя
владя1в
владя1ва
4влетво1ря
влет1в2
вле1к
вле1зе
вля1
3в2тарян
в1та
вта1ря
1вт2и.
в2теч
в1те
в1н
1в2ног1
в1но
вноп1
в2ниш
в1ни
в2н2е.
в1не
1ви
ви1сн
ви3сш2и.
вис2ш
вис1ши
ви3сши1т
вити2е
ви1т
виних3
ви1ни
ви1ет
ви1ко
вик2н
ви3кнат
вик1на
ви2д1р
3ви1до
вид2н
ви1з
ви1хм
4вижв2а.
виж1в
виж1ва
ве3стител.
вести1т
вести1те
ве3стих
ве3сте3на
вес1те
ве3с2те1но
вес2тят
вес1тя
веле1ни2
ве1ле
2в1ето1ю
ве3то
3ветле2н.
вет1л
3ветлен2и.
ветле1ни
3вет1ля
ве1и1т
ве1ет
веч2
ве1ч1на
веч1н
ве1ч1ни
вечест3
ве1че
век1л
ве1ки
1веш
вед4ни1ка
вед1н
вед1ни
вез2д3н
вез1д2
1вех
ве1хм
ве1х2т
веща1ни2
ве1ща
ве1же1
4вувал.
ву1ва
1вуващ
вук2
ву1ка
ву1ко
3вчежни2к.
в1че
в2чеж
вчеж1н
вчеж1ни
3вчежни1ка
2вк
в1ка
в1ки
3вър3ждаван
вър1ж
върж4да
вър2ж1д
вържда1ва
въоб1
въ1о
1вът
1вън
въ1г
1въд
въ1дв
въ1п
в2ц
в3ца
в2ш
1в1ша
1вш2и.
в1ши
1вши1т
1в1ш2е
1вя
в2д
3вдав
в1да
4в3дават
вда1ва
в3дан
в4да2н.
1вдае
1вдая
в3д2и.
в1ди
1вди1во
в3ди1т
вди3гн2е.
вдиг1не
в1дя1
вдяс2
в2з2
в4зе1ма
3вземан
в1па
впо1
впус1
в2х
в1щ
4равле
3равлява3не
равля1
равля1в
равля1ва
4равител1н
ра1ви
рави1т
рави1те
равих3т
3равя1не
ра1вя
3равда1ни
рав2д
рав3дан
рав1да
3ра1мя
ра2бл
рас3ти1т
ра3стие
ра1стъ
рас1к2
ра1лъ
ра1тр
ра3т1на
ра2т1н
рати3хм
ра1ти
рана2с3
ра1на
4ране2н.
ра3не
рак1л
радо1х
ра1до
рах1м
ра1х1та
рах2т
4ражнява3не
раж1н
раж1ня
ражня1в
ражня1ва
р1в
р2в1н
р1м
рмах3
р1ма
р2м1л
р1б
р4бе2н.
рб2е
р1бен
р1с
р2св
р3с2ван
рс1ва
рс2т2
р2с1п
ро1вл
ровик4
ро1ви
1ровър
ро1въ
рори3ст2и.
ро1ри
ро1мъ
ро1бо
ро1бл
робнос3ти
ро2б1н
робност2
роб1но
ро1би
ро1бъ
ро1бя
рос2в
ро3свещ
рос1ве
ро1сл
рос1тр
рос3ти1т
рос2те
ро3сте3на
рос1тъ
ро1си
ро1ск
ро1съ
ро1т
ро4тв2
рот3во1ре
рона3вти
ро1на
рое4но
ро1е
ро1гр
рог1ла
ро1гле
роч4нос
роч1н
роч3но
ро1к
ро1ян
родей3
ро1де
родей2ст4
родейс2
ро1п
ропу3ск2а.
ро1ф
ро1ж2б
р1л
рлих1м
рли1х2т
рт1во
ртв2
рт3ве1но
рт3вени1т
ртве1ни
р3твеник
рт3вения
р1тву
рт1р
р1т2т
р1ти
р1ту
р1тъ
р1н
1р2носл
р1но
р3ност
рнос3т2и.
рно1г
рничест3
р1ни
рни1че
ри3а
1риарш
ри1ме
ри1бл
ри1сл
ри3сти1т
ри1ска
риск2
ри1ско
ри1он
ри1ог1
ри1ет
ри1е2ц
ри1гр
1рич1ни
рич1н
ричест3
ри1че
риче4ск2и.
риче1ск
ри1ко
1рици
ри1ц
ри1до
ри1д1н
ри1з2
ри1п2
3риже1ни
ри1же
ре1вр
ре1ми
3ременни1ц
ре1ме
ремен1н
ремен1ни
1реб2е.
ре1б2е
ре4ср
ре1см
рес1ти
ре2с1к
рес1п
рео3бр
ре1о
ре1л2ц
рен4ска
ре2н1с
ренс3кат
ре1и2т
ре1ет
ре1гл
р2ег
регио3ни
ре1ги
реги1о
ре1кр
ре1ки
ред1р
ре3д2ни1ц
ред1н
ред1ни
ре1зр
ре1з2м2
ре1зо
ре1зи
ре1зе
ре1пи
4репе1ря
ре1пе
ре1ф
1рей1
р1г2
рга1с
р1га
рго1ви2
ру1м
ру1си
ру1ск
ру1съ
ру1го
ру1до
3рупван
ру2п1в
руп1ва
ру1по
р1ч
рчест1
р1че
р1к
р2кв
р4кван
рк1ва
р2к1с
рк2т
ръ1с1та
ръ3сти1т
ръ1стъ
ръг1л
3ръдни2к.
ръд1н
ръд1ни
3ръжи2х.
ръ1жи
р3ши2я
р1ши
рше1с
р1ш2е
ршест2
ря3де
1ряз
ря4з3ал.
ря1за
ря2з3а2н.
ря2з3а2х.
р1д
р2д1с2
р2д1н
р1зо
р1зи
р1зе
р1п
рпя1х
р1пя
р1х
р2х1н
р1ф
р1щ
р1ж
рже3ст2ва
р1же
ржеств2
рже3ство
рж4да
р2ж1д
р3ждаван
ржда1ва
2м.
1ма
мас1ка
маск2
мас1ки
ма1лъ
ма1тр
ма1и
м1в
м1ри
м1ру
2м1б
м1с2
мст2
1мо
мо1а3
мо1вр
мора1з
мо1ра
мо1ръ
мо1б
мо1с2та
мо4с2тов
мос1то
мосто4я
мос1к2
мо1съ
мо1тр
мо1ти
мо1тъ
мона3вти
мо1на
мо1гр
мо1гла
мо1к
2мл
м1лив
м1ли1ща
мли1щ
3млищ2е.
мли1ще
мю1з
м1т
мнас3
м1на
мност2
м1но
мно2с3тт
мни1х2т
м1ни
1мим
ми1о2
ми2тр
ми1т
мит1ра
1мин
2мина1ти
ми1на
1мие
ми1ет
1мич
1мик
1ми1ц
миш1
1мид
1мих
2михн2а.
мих1н
мих1на
ме1ру
мес4т2о.
мес1то
ме3с2тот
мес1ти
мес3те
менос3ти
ме1но
ме1н2ц
менци2
ме1е2л
1ме1ц
ме1дт
мей3с2
мей1
мей2ст2
ме1жъ
м1г
1м2у.
1мув
1мум
му1ми
мус1
1му1л
м1ч
м1к
мъг1
1мъд
м1ш
1мя1ха
м1д2
м1п
мпио2ни
мпи1о
м1фа
м1фо
1мь
2б.
1ба
ба1вля1
ба1ски
баск2
ба1н2ц
банци2
б1в
1бра1ва
3брав2и.
бра1ви
б3равил
б3равиш
б3равих
б1ра1ве
1бра1вя
б1раб
б1рас1
брат2
бра3т1н
бра3т1к
1бра1на
3бран2и.
бра1ни
б3ранил
3брани1т
б3раних
б3ра3не
3б4ране2н.
1бра1ня
1брад
2бра1зи1т
бра1зи
бра1х2т
1брос
2б1рол
брои2л
бро1и
бро1е4
б1рис
б1рич
4бр2е.
б1реч
б1рек
б1ред
б1м
бмис1
2б1с2
бст2
б2ст3ви
бств2
бст3ве3на
бст3вено1т
бстве1но
бст3вен2и.
бстве1ни
бст3вени1т
бст3вения
бс1то4
б2съ1ди
1бов
бо1в2т
бо1ръ
бос1в
бо1сти
бол4ни
бол1н
1бот
бо1ти
бо1ка
бо1ко
бо1д2р
бо1зн
бо1п2
божест3
бо1же
бо3ж2д2а.
бо2ж1д
бож1да
бла2с3т2т
1блаж.
б1ла1жа
4блюдаван
блю1да
блюда1ва
б1л2и.
б1лив
4бли1че
б1ли1ц
б1леч
б1лек
б1лед
б1ля2к1
бляко2
1бю
б1т
2б1н
б3на
бност2
б1но
бно2с3тт
1б2и.
1бим
биб1
бист1
био1
1бин
би1ет
б1ич1н
би1ко
б3икн2а.
бик1на
б1ик3не
1би1ц
1биш
би1хм
1би1щ
б2е
1бер
бе1ми
1бен
бе1г2на
б2ег
бек3ти1т
бе1др
бед2н
бе3дн2о.
бед1но
бе1д1ни
бедих3м
бе1ди
бе2з1а
1бех
б1г
бу1р2н
бу1ре
бу1ру
бу1ми
бу1мъ
бу1с2л
бу1си
бу1ли
бу1ка
бу1ко
бу1ки
1буд
бу3ди
1буж
б1ч
б1к
бър3к2
1бът
бъ3д2нат
бъд1н
бъд1на
бъ1д2не
б1ш
бя1х
1б2де1но
б1де
б1з
б1х
2б1щ
бще3ст2ва
б1ще
бществ2
бще3ство
б1ж
2с.
1с2а
сан1д
са1хм
сво2и1т
сво1и
сво2ет
сво1е
сво2я1та
сво1ят
1с4вир
с1ви
1све1та
1све2т1н
1ср
3сра1ми
2с3ра1мя
1см2и.
смис1л
с1мия
сме1с2т
с4менос
сме1но
3сменос3ти
1смее
1смъ
1смя.
1смял
с2ба
1со
со1бл
со1би
со1бя
со1т
со1к
со2кр
со1п
со4хм
со1х2т
со1фи
с1л2а.
2сла1ва
2слав2и.
сла1ви
4славие
с3лави1ет
3сланик
сла1ни
3слани1ц
с1лани2я
с1л2о.
с1лор
с1лот
2слож
сли1в
1слил
3слино2в.
сли1но
3слино1ва
3слино1ви
с1ли1ни
с1ли3не
с1лие
с1ли1ц
1слиш
1сли2х.
с1ли1ха
1сл2е.
1слел
с1ле3на
с1ле1но
с3ление
сле1ни
с3ления
1с4лед
слез3ем
слез3еш
2сле1пе
3слепен2и.
сле1пен
слепе1ни
1слех
1сле2й1
3с4лушан
слу1ша
1слу2ш1н
1слу1ш2е
с1ля1в
1слял
1сю
2с2т.
4стар
с1та
1с2та1с2а
4ста1ня
стая3
ст2ва1та
ств2
ст1ва
2ст3ва1те
ст4ван
2ства3не
2ст3ваш
3ст2ва1хм
3страсти
с3тро1ва
с3тров1н
ст1ро1т
1с1трир
ст1риб
3стре1но
с1тря
3с2тов2о.
с1то
сто1во
с4тов2и.
сто1ви
3с2тов2е.
сто1ве
3с2торим
сто1ри
4стоя2ван
сто1я1в
стоя1ва
3стойнст1ва
с2той1
стой2н1с
стойнст2
стойнств2
3стой1но
3стой1ни
2стт
ст3на
с2т1н
1ст2нич
ст1ни
ст4ни1ц
с1тив
стис1
4стил
3стител2и.
сти1т
сти1те
стите1ли
3стителя.
стите1ля
4стиган
сти1га
с3тич
с1тик
с1ти1ц
с1тиш
4сте1не
с1те
1с2те1п
с4тяв2а.
с1тя
стя1в
стя1ва
ст4де
ст1д
3снаб1дя
с1на
с2наб
с3нат
с3нач
снах3т
снос3т2и.
с1но
сничест3
с1ни
сни1че
сниче3ст3ва
сничеств2
с3ни1ц
3снем2а.
с1не
сне1ма
1си1а
1сим
си1ме
1сис
си1сти
си3она1ле
сио1на
1си1т
1сии
си1ет
1си1к
си1я1я
1сид
си1з2
1сип
си1хм
си1х2т
1се
сериал3ъ
се1ри
сери3а2
с1ем1т
с1емн
се1ми
се1с
се2т2н
се3тниц2и.
сет1ни
сетни1ц
се3кре2т.
се1кл
сек1т
се1ки
се1з2
се1хм
се1х2т
1су
су1в
су1ро
су1б2е
су1ли
су1т
су1к
с2ч
ска1х2т
с1ках
с3к2ва3не
ск1ва
скрих3м
ско1с
1скот
с1кон
1скл
1ския
съ1б
1със
съо1р
съ1о
съо1бр
1съл
1съ1ю
съ2н1ят
съ1ня
1съч
1сък
съ1зр
с2ц
с3ци
1сци1т
с2ш
1с1ша
1с1ш2е
1ся
с2д
с3ди
сп1рат
спомо3г1на
спо1мо
спомог1н
споя4
спу3ск2а.
с2х
с3ха
сх1ва3
сх2в
схват2
с1фа
2сфе
1сь
сьор1ъ
2о.
о1а
оа2р
оваж3н
о1ва
оваж2
о1вре
ов1ръс
ов1ръ1щ
о1во
ов1лас
о3вления
овле1ни
ови2с
